Massachusetts, session 194th, H1323.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 chapter 32A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “forces”, in line 74, the following
words:- , and a child, regardless of age, diagnosed with autism spectrum disorders, as defined in
section 25.
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of subdivision 2 of section 108 of chapter 175 of the General
Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “persons”, in line 33, the
following words:- , including, but not limited to, dependent persons diagnosed with autism
spectrum disorders, as defined in section 47AA.
SECTION 3. Section 110 of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
amended by adding the following subdivision:-
of 3

(Q) A blanket or general policy of insurance described in subdivision (A), (C) or (D),
except policies or certificates that are not health benefit plans, as defined in section 1 of chapter
176J, or coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs which shall be delivered, issued
or renewed in the commonwealth, shall provide, as benefits to all group members having a place
of employment in the commonwealth, coverage to dependent persons diagnosed with autism
spectrum disorders, as defined in section 47AA.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8OO, as inserted by section 48 of chapter 260 of the acts of 2020, the following section:-
Section 8PP. Any subscription certification under an individual or group nonprofit
hospital service agreement, except certificates which provide stand-alone dental services,
supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, that is delivered, issued or
renewed in the commonwealth, shall provide, as benefits to all individuals or to all group
members having a principal place of employment within the commonwealth, coverage to
dependents diagnosed with autism spectrum disorders, as defined in section 8DD.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4OO, as inserted by section 50 of said chapter 260, the following section:-
Section 4PP. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement, except certificates that provide stand-alone dental services, supplemental coverage to
Medicare or other governmental programs, that is delivered or issued or renewed in the
commonwealth, shall provide, as benefits to all individual subscribers and members within the
commonwealth and to all group members having a principal place of employment within the
of 3

commonwealth, coverage to dependents diagnosed with autism spectrum disorders, as defined in
section 4DD.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 4GG, as inserted by section 52 of said chapter 260, the following section:-
Section 4HH. A health maintenance contract, except certificates which provide stand-
alone dental services, supplemental coverage to Medicare or other governmental programs, shall
provide, as benefits to all individuals or to group members having a principal place of
employment within the commonwealth, coverage to dependents diagnosed with autism spectrum
disorders, as defined in section 4V.
SECTION 7. Section 1 of chapter 176J of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “eligible dependent” and
inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
“Eligible dependent”, the spouse or child of an eligible person, subject to the applicable
terms of the health benefit place covering such employee. The child of an eligible individual or
eligible employee shall be considered an eligible dependent until the end of the child’s twenty-
sixth year of age; provided, however, that a child diagnosed with autism spectrum disorders, as
defined in section 47AA of chapter 175, shall be considered an eligible dependent regardless of
age.
of 3